Washington statutes.
RCW 18.89.150

Reciprocity.

An applicant holding a license in another state may be licensed to practice in this state without examination if the secretary determines that the other state's licensing standards are substantially equivalent to the standards in this state.

[ 1997 c 334 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1997 c 334: See note following RCW 18.89.010.